Utah statutes.
41-1a-506.   Exceptions to title requirements for manufactured homes or mobile homes.

(1)  A manufactured home or mobile home in this state is subject to the titling provisions of this part except:

(a)  a manufactured home or mobile home owned and operated by the federal government; and

(b)  a manufactured home or mobile home that has been converted to real property under Section 70D-2-401 if:

(i) (A)  an Affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture is issued by the division for that home; and

(B)  the home is permanently affixed to real property; or

(ii) (A)  the home is permanently affixed to real property;

(B)  the home is not registered with the division;

(C)  the home is taxed as an improvement to real estate by the county assessor as permitted under Section 59-2-1503; and

(D)  the manufacturer's identification number or numbers are included in the deed or loan document recorded with the county recorder.

(2)  A manufactured home or mobile home previously converted to real property but that has been separated from the real property is subject to the titling provisions of this part upon separation.



Amended by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

